Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,130
Action by claimant against incumbent of office; judgment for plaintiff; suit for damages by claimant.

When judgment has been rendered in favor of the claimant, the claimant may at any time within one year after the entry of the judgment bring suit against the defendant and recover the damages the claimant has sustained by reason of the act of the defendant.

R.S.1867, Code § 713, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8337;

C.S.1922, § 9289;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,121;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,130;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 20.